Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Asset sustainability ratio targets. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must calculate and report the asset sustainability ratio (ASR) for pavements for each fiscal year. The ASR must be based on criteria developed by the commissioner and found in the Pavement Design Manual. The ASR is calculated as: new text end new text begin (1) total mile years added; divided by new text end new text begin (2) total system mileage. new text end new text begin (b) The department must meet the following pavement system targets for ASR: new text end new text begin (1) not less than 0.65 by 2027; new text end new text begin (2) not less than 0.75 by 2029; and new text end new text begin (3) not less than 0.85 by 2031 and thereafter. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must report ASR results from projects constructed by the department for each year and include the results in the annual transportation system performance report under subdivision 12, paragraph (d). new text end